Tennessee statutes. Title 41 Correctional Institutions and Inmates
Chapter 8

County Correctional Incentives Act of 1981

41-8-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “County Correctional Incentives Act of 1981.”

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 1; T.C.A., § 41-10-101.

Cross-References. Funding for correctional facilities, title 4, ch. 31, part 4.

41-8-102. Purpose of chapter.

This chapter provides financial incentives to counties to house additional nondangerous felony offenders locally. The purpose of the chapter is to mutually benefit state and county governments by:

Helping alleviate overcrowding in state correctional facilities and reducing high operation costs; and

Assisting counties in upgrading local correctional facilities and programs.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 2; T.C.A., § 41-10-102.

41-8-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Applicant county” means any county that applies to participate in the program;

“Approved applicant county” means any county selected as a participating county and any other applicant county certified by the commissioner as having submitted an acceptable proposal for participation in the program at a future date;

“Certified” refers to whether any jail, workhouse or penal farm facility has been found to have met the minimum standards for local correctional facilities as provided for in § 41-4-140. Determination as to whether any facility has met these minimum standards shall be made by the director of the jail inspection division of the Tennessee corrections institute and certified to the county mayor and to the state judicial cost accountant;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of correction or the commissioner's designee;

“County correctional incentive program” or “program” means the method of providing financial assistance and incentive to counties for the purposes provided in this chapter, through increased subsidies, grants or loans;

“Detainee day” refers to each day each state prisoner was held by a county prior to judgment, which shall include acquittal, or prior to delivery to the department of correction during a designated contract period;

“Grant” means those funds provided under this chapter by the state to the county for which the state does not require repayment by the county;

“Loan” means those funds provided under this chapter by the state to the county for which the state does require repayment by the county;

“Participating county” means any county having a certified or provisionally certified facility or any other county selected for participation in the program by the commissioner;

“Plan” means the method by which the county intends to utilize the assistance available under this chapter;

“Prisoner day” means each day each state prisoner was held by a county pursuant to § 40-23-104 or § 40-35-311 and during a designated contract period, where applicable. “Prisoner day” also means each day each state prisoner sentenced to the department of correction was held by a county after the first five (5) days of incarceration following sentencing and during a designated contract period, where applicable; provided, that the prisoner's commitment to the department was delayed pursuant to chapter 1, part 5 of this title or pursuant to the order of a federal court; and

“Subsidy” means that amount of money paid by the state to a county in accordance with § 41-8-106.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 3; T.C.A., § 41-10-103; Acts 1983, ch. 357, §§ 1, 2; 1984, ch. 896, § 1; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 55; 1986, ch. 744, § 25; 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

41-8-104. Participation in program.

Participation by any county in the program is absolutely voluntary. If a county facility is certified or provisionally certified, the county shall be entitled to the compensation provided in § 41-8-106 and shall not be required to meet the additional requirements of this section. If a county facility is not certified or provisionally certified, the county must meet the additional requirements of this section to be eligible for the compensation provided in § 41-8-106.

No county may participate in the program until it has submitted a plan and is selected for participation in the program by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall enter into contracts with those counties approved for participation in this program on an annual basis. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the exercise of this discretion shall not be reviewable in any other forum so long as the counties are selected in accordance with the procedures established by this chapter and the rules adopted pursuant to it.

The commissioner shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the following factors in selecting counties to participate in this program:

Representative nature of the county, including geographic location, county population and crime population;

Condition of existing county facilities;

Current capacity of the county facilities to house additional felony offenders;

Potential for increasing the county's capacity for housing additional felony offenders;

Adequacy of present programs and nature of proposed improvements in relation to certification requirements as defined by the Tennessee corrections institute board of control;

Whether and to what extent inmates are worked or are planned to be worked in county work programs;

Whether and to what extent inmates are permitted to participate in work release programs;

Nature and amount of state assistance needed to finance and operate county facilities; and

Availability of state funds.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 4; T.C.A., § 41-10-104; Acts 1984, ch. 896, § 2; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 54.

41-8-105. Submission and review of county plans.

Any county is authorized to submit a plan to the commissioner in which it seeks to participate in the program.

The plan shall be submitted in the manner established pursuant to the rules promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

The plan shall be approved by the county commission and the county sheriff before it will be considered by the commissioner.

The jail inspection division of the Tennessee corrections institute shall provide any assistance requested by the commissioner in the review and evaluation of any plan submitted by the counties and of the county's implementation of a plan that is approved.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 5; T.C.A., § 41-10-105; Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 65; 2020, ch. 711, § 7.

Code Commission Notes.

The former last sentence of subsection (a) was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2010. The sentence read: “Additionally, any county which had contracted for the construction of a new correctional facility after January 1, 1981, but prior to June 5, 1981, and which had not arranged permanent financing for construction prior to June 5, 1981, is authorized to submit a plan.”

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted the second sentence of (b) which read: “The commissioner shall notify the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives upon receipt of each application.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11. June 15, 2020.

41-8-106. Housing state prisoners — Contracting — Reimbursement of costs — Debt service.

No county shall be required to house convicted felons sentenced to more than one (1) year of continuous confinement unless the county, through the authority of its county legislative body, has chosen to contract with the department of correction for the purpose of housing certain felons. The department shall promulgate rules for requirements and procedures for contracting.

Counties may contract, in writing, with the state or with other counties for responsibility of correctional populations.

Counties shall be reimbursed for housing convicted felons pursuant to the general appropriations act and according to rules and regulations for determining reasonable allowable costs as promulgated by the department, in consultation with the comptroller of the treasury. The department is authorized to include capital costs within the meaning of reasonable allowable costs. Capital costs may include, but are not limited to, debt service.

The commissioner is authorized, without promulgation of rules and regulations, to agree to reimburse a county for debt service on debt issued by the county in constructing correctional facilities for the purpose of housing inmates sentenced to the county under the authority of a contract entered into under subsection (a). In addition to principal, interest and redemption premiums, debt service may include other necessary items or costs reasonably related to the issuance of such county debt. Upon entering an agreement, the department is authorized to reimburse the county for one hundred percent (100%) of debt service, regardless of whether the county is actually housing inmates under a contract, and until a contract is terminated. The commissioner may not, following execution of any such agreement, amend existing rules and regulations or promulgate new rules and regulations that will impair the state's obligation to reimburse debt service as provided in an agreement. Any obligation for the reimbursement of debt service shall be a contractual obligation of the state.

It is the intent of the state that the holders of debt issued by a county for which the department has agreed to reimburse debt service pursuant to an agreement under this section may rely on, and benefit from, this section and of any obligation by the department and the state to reimburse the county for debt service contained in any agreement, and the state pledges to and agrees with any holders that the state will not amend this section, or limit or alter the obligation of the department and the state to reimburse debt service under any agreement, in any way that would impair the rights and remedies of any holders, or of the county, with respect to reimbursement. This subsection (d) shall not affect the right of the commissioner to terminate any agreement entered into under this section pursuant to the terms set forth in any agreements.

The subsidies paid to counties pursuant to this chapter shall be the only compensation from the state to which counties are entitled for housing state prisoners and shall be in lieu of the fees allowed in § 8-26-106 or any other section.

The department is further authorized to provide additional subsidies to counties for the purpose of community and other diversion programs for pretrial detainees, misdemeanants or convicted felons subject to available appropriations and in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

The department shall take into its custody all convicted felons from any county that had not contracted with the state as authorized by subsection (b). The department shall not be required to take actual physical custody of any of the felons until fourteen (14) days after the department has received all certified sentencing documents from the clerk of the sentencing court.

The commissioner is authorized to compensate any county that has not contracted with the state as authorized by subsection (b) for that county's reasonable, allowable cost of housing felons. The rate of compensation to these counties shall be determined by and is subject to the level of funding authorized in the appropriations bill; however, the commissioner shall not compensate any county that fails or refuses to promptly transfer actual physical custody of an inmate to the department after being requested by the department, in writing, to do so for each day or portion of a day that the county fails to transfer the inmate. The written notice shall include the date it intends to take custody of the inmate for transfer to the department. The notice shall be given as soon as practicable before the transfer date. By June 15, 2005, the department shall notify each sheriff of the provisions of this subdivision (g)(2) and the consequences for failing to comply with it.

In the event that a county has been reimbursed pursuant to this section for housing convicted felons for a continuous period of three (3) or more fiscal years and has received the maximum amount allowed per prisoner per day as reasonable allowable costs during this period, then the county shall thereafter be presumed to be entitled to the full maximum amount allocated per prisoner per day as reimbursement of reasonable allowable costs for housing such prisoners and will not be required to provide documentation to the department regarding costs incurred beyond information necessary to determine the number of prisoner days for which the county is entitled to reimbursement.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 6; T.C.A., § 41-10-106; Acts 1984, ch. 896, § 3; 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §§ 46, 53; 1986, ch. 744, § 26; 1988, ch. 869, § 1; 1989, ch. 462, § 1; 1991, ch. 374, §§ 4, 5, 7; 2003, ch. 355, § 58; 2005, ch. 174, § 3; 2011, ch. 229, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

Attorney General Opinions. County may charge work release participants for board despite state housing compensation, OAG 99-081, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (4/5/99).

No county may be required to house convicted felons who have been sentenced to more than one year of continuous confinement unless the county has contracted with Tennessee Department of Correction (TDOC) for the purpose of housing certain felons. TDOC must take into its custody felons from any county that has not contracted with TDOC as permitted by statute. OAG 16-21, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 22 (6/6/2016).

41-8-107. Use of subsidy by counties.

Participating counties having a facility that is not certified pursuant to the most recently established state jail standards shall not diminish their current level of spending for correctional expenses to the extent of any subsidy received pursuant to this chapter. The subsidy provided in this chapter is for expenditures for correctional purposes.

The subsidy received by the counties pursuant to this chapter shall be dedicated exclusively for use in the county's correctional programs. The entire subsidy received shall be appropriated for the benefit of the correctional program.

If the facility has been inspected and certified pursuant to the most recently established state jail standards, the entire subsidy may be used for current operating expenses. In all other situations, seventy-five percent (75%) of the subsidy shall be used for improving correctional programs or facilities.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 7; T.C.A., § 41-10-107; Acts 1984, ch. 896, §§ 4, 5; 1985, ch. 270, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. In its opinion filed December 13, 2005, Opinion No. 05-177, the office of the attorney general of the state of Tennessee stated: “It is the opinion of this Office that the requirement in Tenn. Code Ann. § 41-8-107 that noncertified counties use seventy-five percent (75%) of their subsidy to fund correctional improvements was implicitly repealed by the legislative restructuring of the county reimbursement program in 1988 from a flat rate subsidy system to a system of reimbursement of reasonable allowable costs and is not enforceable. Requiring use of monies to fund correctional improvements runs counter to the concept of reimbursing counties for their reasonable allowable costs.”

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 41-8-107(c) has been implicitly repealed and is not enforceable, OAG 05-177, 2005 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (12/13/05).

41-8-108. Commissioner to promulgate rules.

The commissioner is authorized and directed to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for purposes including, but not limited to:

General administration of the county incentive program;

Requirements for county plans;

Evaluation of plans submitted by counties; and

Termination of county participation.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 8; T.C.A., § 41-10-108.

41-8-109. Grants or loans to counties by state funding board — Restrictions.

The state funding board is authorized to make grants or loans, as funds are available, to any approved applicant county to assist that county in the construction or renovation of a correctional facility.

No county shall award any construction contract in reliance on a grant or loan until such time as the state funding board and the county have executed a contract pursuant to § 41-8-110 or § 41-8-111, and until the state building commission has acted pursuant to § 4-15-102, when an application for a grant has been approved.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 9; T.C.A., § 41-10-109.

41-8-110. State funding board authorized to issue bonds and notes — Counties to submit financing agreements and contracts.

For the purpose of providing moneys to assist approved applicant counties in financing capital improvements of correctional facilities, the state funding board, in addition to the powers otherwise granted by law, has the power and is authorized to issue from time to time direct general obligation interest-bearing bonds and bond anticipation notes in such principal amounts as may from time to time be authorized by law.

Loans or grants authorized in accordance with § 41-8-109 shall be made from the proceeds of the bonds or notes to an approved applicant county in the county correctional incentive program. The board shall require the county to submit a financing agreement that includes provisions for the payment of the cost of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping or furnishing any county correctional facility, including the payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with the facility and the issuance of the bonds or notes, and shall require the county to execute a contract specifying, among other things, the repayment terms and the project to be funded.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 10; T.C.A., § 41-10-110.

41-8-111. Contract terms — Management or operational changes — Restriction on sentencing and commitment.

If the project is to be funded in whole or in part by a grant, the contract may include such provisions as may be agreed upon by the parties to the contract, and shall include in substance, the following provisions:

An agreement by the state to pay the county an amount up to and including one hundred percent (100%) of the actual cost of the project. Part of the grant may be paid to the county as a first advance prior to the construction and during the progress of the construction at a rate in proportion to the rate of construction. The grant may be paid following completion of the construction, as may be agreed upon by the parties;

An agreement by the county to proceed expeditiously with and complete the project in accordance with approved plans; and

An agreement by the county to reserve, keep and maintain a specified number of available cell spaces in the jail for state prisoners under the terms of the contract;

An agreement by the county as to the types of state prisoners with regard to offenses committed and sentences imposed who may be housed in the jail under the terms of the contract; provided, that the county agrees to house any and all felons sentenced to six (6) years or less, if sufficient cell space is provided, or such other felons as may be mutually agreed to by the county and the department of correction, if additional space is reserved by contract;

An agreement that any new construction shall conform to American Correctional Association standards for the purposes proposed for the facilities;

An agreement that the county will repay grant funds to the state if the county withdraws or otherwise terminates the contract to keep state prisoners;

An agreement that in the event a prisoner held in the county facility becomes a discipline problem sufficient to require a closer custody status that cannot be provided adequately or safely in the county facility, the county shall have the authority to petition the sentencing judge for transfer of that prisoner to the department; and

An agreement may provide for a gradual reduction or increase in the number of state prisoners held pursuant to subdivision (a)(3)(A).

Any proposal by the county to subcontract for management of the facility, or any other proposal that would alter the management or operational arrangement specified in the contract, shall be submitted to the department and the funding board for approval. No management or operational change shall be made without the prior approval of the department and the funding board and until an amendment to the contract between the state and the county is effectuated.

Compensation for the housing of state prisoners in any correctional facility constructed or renovated with funds provided in whole or in part by a grant under this chapter shall be paid in accordance with § 41-8-106 and no other jailer's fees for those prisoners shall be paid by the state.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 11; T.C.A., § 41-10-111; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, § 45; 1987, ch. 105, §§ 1-5.

Cross-References. Reimbursement of jailer for keeping state prisoners, § 8-26-106.

41-8-112. Repayment of loans — County's failure to remit.

The county shall pledge its full faith and credit for the repayment of a loan pursuant to this chapter.

In the event any county having entered into a loan contract pursuant to this chapter fails to remit funds in accordance with any amortization schedule established for the loan, the commissioner of finance and administration shall deliver by certified mail a written notice of the failure to the county. In the event the county fails to remit the amount set forth in the notice within sixty (60) days of the receipt of the notice, the commissioner of finance and administration may, without further authorization, withhold that sum or part of that sum from any state-shared taxes that are otherwise apportioned to the county.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 12; T.C.A., § 41-10-112.

41-8-113. Special account to be established.

There is authorized to be established in the general fund of the state treasury a special account for depositing available funds under this chapter and for disbursing those funds to the counties that qualify for grants or loans under this chapter; provided, that the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the comptroller of the treasury, may establish the account in such other manner as is deemed appropriate.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 13; T.C.A., § 41-10-113.

41-8-114. Counties free to seek other aid.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to limit the right of any county to accept any gift, grant or loan of funds or financial or other aid of any form that might otherwise be available to that county from the state or federal government or any agency of the state or federal government or from any other sources or from complying with the terms and conditions of the aid not inconsistent with this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 14; T.C.A., § 41-10-114.

41-8-115. Federal funds.

The commissioner is authorized and empowered to seek and receive funds from the federal government that will augment the funds appropriated by the state to implement this chapter.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 15; T.C.A., § 41-10-115.

41-8-116. Title 9, chapter 9 applicable to this chapter.

The issuance and payment of bonds and bond anticipation notes and the administration of funds for the purpose of this chapter shall be in accordance with title 9, chapter 9.

It is the legislative intent that all bonds and bond anticipation notes issued pursuant to this chapter are also to be considered as issued under title 9, chapter 9.

Acts 1981, ch. 491, § 16; T.C.A., § 41-10-116.

41-8-117. [Transferred.]

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 41-8-117 (Acts 1986, ch. 744, § 27), concerning reports on prisoners escaping from work details, was transfered to § 41-4-143 in 2006 by the code commission.

41-8-118. Participation of regional jail authority.

A regional jail authority created pursuant to chapter 12 of this title is authorized to participate in the program created pursuant to this chapter in the same manner and to the same extent as counties are authorized to participate.

Acts 2008, ch. 1092, § 26.